Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 1. Ownership.

Sec. 42.20.010.
Establishment by foreigners prohibited.

Cable lines owned or operated or controlled by persons not citizens of the United States, or by any foreign corporation or government, may not be established in or permitted to enter the state.

History.

(§ 49-5-1 ACLA 1949; am § 91 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, deleted “Telegraph or” at the beginning, and made a related change.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section is unenforceable because it is preempted by Section 253 of the Telecommunications Act of 1996 (47 U.S.C. 253). August 5, 1998 Op. Att’y Gen.

Collateral references. —

74 Am. Jur. 2d, Telecommunications, §§ 1 - 3.